New Jersey, session 221, A299.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     A resident taxpayer who has graduated from a New Jersey high school and from a New Jersey institute of higher education with a grade point average of 3.5 or higher and is an eligible employee for a New Jersey employer within two years following graduation from a New Jersey institution of higher education, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount of $1,500 for the taxable year. b.    A credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not reduce the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year to an amount less than zero. c.     A credit allowed pursuant to this section may be claimed only for the first five consecutive tax years following eligible employment and only if the requirements of subsection a. are met the year that the credit is claimed. d.    As used in this section: Eligible employee means a full-time employee who works a normal work week of 25 or more hours. Eligible employment means an eligible employee employed by an employer located in New Jersey. Employer located in New Jersey means any partnership, limited liability company or corporation doing business in this State. Graduation from a New Jersey institute of higher education means to receive an undergraduate degree from a New Jersey institution of higher education. New Jersey high school means a high school located in New Jersey, whether private or public. New Jersey institution of higher education means an institution which qualifies as a public institution of higher education pursuant to N.J.S.18A:62-1 et seq., or an institution eligible for assistance pursuant to section 3 of P.L. 1979, c.132 (N.J.S.18A:72B-15 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning after the date of enactment.